test/src/gt-norm-yamls/U-all_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - aikkoot - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     aikkoot+V+Inf: aikkoot
     aikkoot+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aijon
     aikkoot+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: aijot
     aikkoot+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aikkoo
     aikkoot+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: aijoma
     aikkoot+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: aijotta
     aikkoot+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: aijothaan
     aikkoot+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: aijoin
     aikkoot+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: aijoit
     aikkoot+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: aikoi
     aikkoot+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: aijoima
     aikkoot+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: aijoitta
     aikkoot+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: aijothiin
     aikkoot+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: aikonu
     aikkoot+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: aijottu
     aikkoot+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: aikonheet
     aikkoot+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: aikkoova
     aikkoot+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: aikkoovat
     aikkoot+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: aijottava
     aikkoot+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: aijottavat
  
     aikkoot+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: aikoisin
     aikkoot+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: aikoisit
     aikkoot+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: aikois
     aikkoot+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: aikoisimma
     aikkoot+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: aikoisitta
     aikkoot+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: aijottais
     aikkoot+V+Pass+Cond: aijottais
  
     aikkoot+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: aijo
     aikkoot+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: aikokkaa
     
     aikkoot+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: aikomassa
     aikkoot+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: aikomasta
     aikkoot+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: aikomhaan
     aikkoot+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: aikomalla
     aikkoot+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: aikomatta

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - ajatella - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     ajatella+V+Inf: ajatella
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ajattelen
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ajattelet
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ajattellee
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ajattelema
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ajatteletta
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ajatelhaan
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ajattelin
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ajattelit
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ajatteli
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: ajattelima
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ajattelitta
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ajatelthiin
     ajatella+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: ajatellu
     ajatella+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: ajateltu
     ajatella+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: ajatelheet
     ajatella+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: ajattelleeva
     ajatella+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: ajattelleevat
     ajatella+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: ajateltava
     ajatella+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: ajateltavat

     ajatella+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: ajattelisin
     ajatella+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: ajattelisit
     ajatella+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: ajattelis
     ajatella+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: ajattelisimma
     ajatella+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: ajattelisitta
     ajatella+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: ajateltais
     ajatella+V+Pass+Cond: ajateltais

     ajatella+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: ajattele
     ajatella+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: ajatelkkaa
     
     ajatella+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: ajattelemassa
     ajatella+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: ajattelemasta
     ajatella+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: ajattelemhaan
     ajatella+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: ajattelemalla
     ajatella+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: ajattelematta

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - anttaat - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     anttaat+V+Inf: anttaat
     anttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: annan
     anttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: annat
     anttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: anttaa
     anttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: annama
     anttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: annatta
     anttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: annethaan
     anttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: annoin
     anttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: annoit
     anttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: antoi
     anttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: annoima
     anttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: annoitta
     anttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: annethiin
     anttaat+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: antanu
     anttaat+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: annettu
     anttaat+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: antanheet
     anttaat+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: anttaava
     anttaat+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: anttaavat
     anttaat+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: annettava
     anttaat+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: annettavat

     anttaat+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: antaisin
     anttaat+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: antaisit
     anttaat+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: antais
     anttaat+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: antaisimma
     anttaat+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: antaisitta
     anttaat+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: annettais
     anttaat+V+Pass+Cond: annettais

     anttaat+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: anna
     anttaat+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: antakkaa
     
     anttaat+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: antamassa
     anttaat+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: antamasta
     anttaat+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: antamhaan
     anttaat+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: antamalla
     anttaat+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: antamatta

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - assuut - ok : # Verb 'to live' - ei tsekattu!
     assuut+V+Inf: assuut
     assuut+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: asun
     assuut+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: asut
     assuut+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: assuu
     assuut+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: asuma
     assuut+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: asutta
     assuut+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: asuthaan
     assuut+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: asuin
     assuut+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: asuit
     assuut+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: asui
     assuut+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: asuima
     assuut+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: asuitta
     assuut+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: asuthiin
     assuut+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: asunu
     assuut+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: asuttu
     assuut+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: asunheet
     assuut+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: assuuva
     assuut+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: assuuvat
     assuut+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: asuttava
     assuut+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: asuttavat
  
     assuut+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: asuisin
     assuut+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: asuisit
     assuut+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: asuis
     assuut+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: asuisimma
     assuut+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: asuisitta
     assuut+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: asuttais
     assuut+V+Pass+Cond: asuttais
  
     assuut+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: asu
     assuut+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: asukkaa
     
     assuut+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: asumassa
     assuut+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: asumasta
     assuut+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: asumhaan
     assuut+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: asumalla
     assuut+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: asumatta

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - aukaista - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     aukaista+V+Inf: aukaista
     aukaista+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aukaisen
     aukaista+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: aukaiset
     aukaista+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aukaissee
     aukaista+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: aukaisemma
     aukaista+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: aukaisetta
     aukaista+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: aukaisthaan
     aukaista+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: aukaisin
     aukaista+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: aukaisit
     aukaista+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: aukaisi
     aukaista+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: aukaisimma
     aukaista+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: aukaisitta
     aukaista+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: aukaisthiin
     aukaista+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: aukaissu
     aukaista+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: aukaistu
     aukaista+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: aukaisheet
     aukaista+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: aukaisseeva
     aukaista+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: aukaisseevat
     aukaista+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: aukaistava
     aukaista+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: aukaistavat
     
     aukaista+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: aukaisisin
     aukaista+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: aukaisisit
     aukaista+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: aukaisis
     aukaista+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: aukaisisima
     aukaista+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: aukaisisitta
     aukaista+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: aukaistais
     aukaista+V+Pass+Cond: aukaistais
     
     aukaista+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: aukaise
     aukaista+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: aukaiskaa
     
     aukaista+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: aukaisemassa
     aukaista+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: aukaisemasta
     aukaista+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: aukaisemhaan
     aukaista+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: aukaisemala
     aukaista+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: aukaisematta

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - hantteerata - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ei tsekattu
     hantteerata+V+Inf: hantteerata
     hantteerata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hantteeraan
     hantteerata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: hantteeraat
     hantteerata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hantteeraa
     hantteerata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: hantteeraama
     hantteerata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: hantteeraatta
     hantteerata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: hantteerathaan
     hantteerata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: hantteerasin
     hantteerata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: hantteerasit
     hantteerata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: hantteeras
     hantteerata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: hantteerasima
     hantteerata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: hantteerasitta
     hantteerata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: hantteerathiin
     hantteerata+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: hantteerannu
     hantteerata+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: hantteerattu
     hantteerata+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: hantteeranheet
     hantteerata+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: hantteeraava
     hantteerata+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: hantteeraavat
     hantteerata+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: hantteerattava
     hantteerata+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: hantteerattavat

     hantteerata+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: hantteeraisin
     hantteerata+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: hantteeraisit
     hantteerata+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: hantteerais
     hantteerata+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: hantteeraisima
     hantteerata+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: hantteeraisitta
     hantteerata+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: hantteerattais
     hantteerata+V+Pass+Cond: hantteerattais
    
     hantteerata+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: hantteeraa
     hantteerata+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: hantteeraakkaa
     
     hantteerata+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: hantteeraamassa
     hantteerata+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: hantteeraamasta
     hantteerata+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: hantteeraamhaan
     hantteerata+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: hantteeraamala
     hantteerata+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: hantteeraamatta

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - haravoita - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ei tsekattu
     haravoita+V+Inf: haravoita
     haravoita+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: haravoitten
     haravoita+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: haravoittet
     haravoita+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haravoittee
     haravoita+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: haravoittema
     haravoita+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: haravoittetta
     haravoita+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: haravoithaan
     haravoita+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: haravoittin
     haravoita+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: haravoittit
     haravoita+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: haravoitti
     haravoita+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: haravoittima
     haravoita+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: haravoittitta
     haravoita+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: haravoithiin
     haravoita+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: haravoinu
     haravoita+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: haravoittu
     haravoita+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: haravoinheet
     haravoita+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: haravoiva
     haravoita+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: haravoivat
     haravoita+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: haravoittava
     haravoita+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: haravoittavat

     haravoita+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: haravoittisin
     haravoita+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: haravoittisit
     haravoita+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: haravoittis
     haravoita+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: haravoittisimma
     haravoita+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: haravoittisitta
     haravoita+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: haravoittais
     haravoita+V+Pass+Cond: haravoittais

     haravoita+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: haravoitte
     haravoita+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: haravoikkaa
     
     haravoita+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: haravoittemassa
     haravoita+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: haravoittemasta
     haravoita+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: haravoittemhaan
     haravoita+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: haravoittemalla
     haravoita+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: haravoittematta

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 
